Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 16 Quieting Title

34-16-1.
Action brought by person claiming through sale or proceedings requiring notice.

Any person or persons claiming title to real estate, which title is based upon or has come through a deed of a tax collector or town or city treasurer upon sale of real estate for the collection of taxes, assessments, or municipal liens of any kind, or of a sheriff on execution sale, or any deed, grant, or conveyance given under judicial proceedings, or otherwise, the validity of which depends upon notice of any kind, may, although his or her title to the real estate is undisputed, bring a civil action against the person or persons whose title and interest, or either, were sold out under the sale or proceedings, and against any other persons that may be interested in the real estate because of the sale or proceedings, or the giving of such a deed to determine the validity of the title or estate of the person or persons therein, to remove any cloud thereon, and to affirm and quiet the possession and title of the person or persons; provided, however, that where a period of redemption is by statute provided, in which the real estate passing under any sale or proceedings described in this section may be redeemed, the period of redemption must have expired before the bringing of any action under this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 40; P.L. 1932, ch. 1906, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

34-16-1

.

34-16-2.
Examination of title — Notice to parties in interest.

Upon filing his or her complaint, the plaintiff shall thereafter, at his or her own cost, select, with the approval of the court, a title company or an attorney familiar with the examination of land titles, which company or attorney shall proceed to examine the title to the real estate described in the complaint, and when the examination is completed, shall deposit an abstract of title to the real estate in the court, together with a report of the status of the title and a list of the parties found interested therein, and who should, in the opinion of the company or attorney, be made parties to the action. Upon receipt of the abstract and report, the court shall order all persons not parties to the action but found by it to be necessary to the cause to be made parties defendant and shall order notice to be given to those defendants.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 40; P.L. 1932, ch. 1906, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

34-16-2

.

34-16-3.
Determination of title — Decree.

A cause of action under this chapter shall follow the course of equity so far as equity is applicable, and the court shall determine the validity of the title of the plaintiffs, and may affirm the title, or if it finds other parties to have any title and estate therein, it shall also determine the interest, title, and estate of those parties therein, and may remove any clouds on the title by reason of any deed, grant, or conveyance as described in §

34-16-1

or otherwise, and all decrees in the action shall forever thereafter be binding upon all parties thereto and those claiming by, through, under, or by virtue of them, or any of them.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 40; P.L. 1932, ch. 1906, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

34-16-3

.

34-16-4.
Action brought by person claiming through conveyance, devise, or inheritance.

Any person or persons claiming title to real estate, or any interest or estate, legal or equitable, in real estate, including any warrantor in any deed or other instrument in the chain of title to the real estate, which title, interest, or estate is based upon, or has come through, a deed, grant, conveyance, devise, or inheritance, purporting to vest in the person or persons or his, her, or their predecessors in title the whole title to such real estate, or any fractional part thereof or any interest or estate therein, may bring a civil action against all persons claiming, or who may claim, and against all persons appearing to have of record any adverse interest therein, to determine the validity of his, her, or their title or estate therein, to remove any cloud thereon, and to affirm and quiet his, her, or their title to the real estate. The action may be brought under the provisions of this section whether the plaintiff may be in or out of possession and whether or not the action might be brought under the provisions of §

34-16-1

or under the provisions of any other statute.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 26; P.L. 1940, ch. 938, § 1; P.L. 1941, ch. 1005, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-16-4

.

34-16-5.
Contents of complaint.

The complaint shall contain, among other things, to the extent known to plaintiff:

A complete and accurate description of the real estate involved, and the right, title and interest of the plaintiff claimed therein and the character and source thereof;

A recital of the character and source of claims adverse, or which may become adverse, whether asserted or unasserted, and, if unasserted, then of record;

The names and last known addresses of those asserting, or who may assert, any adverse claims;

The efforts made to ascertain and determine those claimants, who, or whose names and/or addresses, are unknown to plaintiff;

The duration of ownership, occupation, possession, and enjoyment by the plaintiff, and when relevant, by his or her predecessors in title, of the estate involved, together with a recital of acts performed as a normal incident of the possession enjoyed and the title claimed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 26; P.L. 1940, ch. 938, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-16-5

.

34-16-6.
Filing of abstract of title.

Upon the filing of the complaint the court may, in its discretion, require that the plaintiff file an abstract of title to the real estate as specified in §

34-16-2

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 26; P.L. 1941, ch. 1005, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-16-6

.

34-16-7.
Presumption of lost grant by adverse possession.

Open, adverse, exclusive, and uninterrupted possession and enjoyment by the plaintiff, or by his or her predecessors in title or both the plaintiff and predecessors together of the real estate or his, her, or their interest therein described in the complaint, for a period of at least ten (10) years, shall raise the rebuttable presumption in law and in fact of a lost grant, properly executed and delivered, effective to cure the defect or defects in plaintiff’s title, as set forth in the complaint and/or to remove the cloud thereon, as it concerns any party named or referred to in the cause.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 26; P.L. 1940, ch. 938, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-16-7

.

34-16-8.
Parties barred by presumption of lost grant.

Under §

34-16-7

, proof satisfactory to the court, and adequate to justify it, shall be effective to bar every claim of any party named or referred to in the cause adverse to plaintiff’s title, and every adverse and inconsistent right, title, and interest therein of any such party, whether as owner, tenant, joint tenant or tenant in common, mortgagee, creditor, lienholder, or otherwise and the heirs, executors, administrators, successors, and assigns of each of them, and all those in privity with them, who shall claim, or but for this provision might claim, an interest in the real estate involved, and to remove every cloud thereon; and the presumption provided in §

34-16-7

, unless rebutted, shall be conclusive.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 26; P.L. 1940, ch. 938, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-16-8

.

34-16-9.
Inclusion of unknown defendants in complaint.

The complaint may include as defendants in such cause, in addition to such persons as appear of record to have, or are known to have or to assert, or who may have or assert, some claim to, or interest in, the lands described in the complaint adverse to the plaintiff’s right, title or interest therein:

All other persons unknown to, or unascertained by, the plaintiff, who claim, or may claim, any right, title or interest in such real estate; and

All others in privity with them or whose interest does or may constitute a cloud upon the title of the plaintiff thereto, as described in the complaint.

The complaint may include such unknown defendants in substantially the following language:

“Also all other persons unknown and unascertained, claiming, or who may claim, any right, title, estate, lien, or interest in the real estate involved, which is, or might become, adverse to the plaintiff’s right, title, or interest therein as alleged or which does or may constitute any cloud upon plaintiff’s title thereto, as set forth in the complaint.”

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 26; P.L. 1940, ch. 938, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-16-9

.

34-16-10.
Service of process on residents.

Service of process upon known defendants residing or located in the state whose residence or place of business therein is known or can be ascertained by the plaintiff shall be made personally, as provided by law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 26; P.L. 1940, ch. 938, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-16-10

.

34-16-11.
Service on nonresidents.

A nonresident defendant whose place of residence or business is known to the plaintiff shall be served by sending the process registered or certified mail to the defendant postpaid, addressed to his or her residence or place of business last known to the plaintiff.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 26; P.L. 1940, ch. 938, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-16-11

.

34-16-12.
Service on defendants unknown or with unknown addresses.

Service of process upon all unknown defendants, resident or nonresident, or others known, but whose names or addresses are unknown to, or unascertained by, the plaintiff shall be made by publication of an order of notice, to be entered by the court in some public newspaper published in this state, to be designated by the court, for such length of time as the court shall direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 26; P.L. 1940, ch. 938, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-16-12

.

34-16-13.
Proof of service — Jurisdiction of parties.

The court shall be satisfied before proceeding to hear the cause on its merits that there has been full compliance with the requirements of this chapter with respect to the service of process and may accept the affidavit of any plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney of record as proof of service of process in cases where service has been ordered by mailing or publication. All persons served in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall be and become parties defendant to the proceedings, and the service shall be valid, and complete and fully effectual to give jurisdiction over them for the purposes of adjudicating, determining, and/or forever barring their interest and those of all others representing or in privity with them notwithstanding the legal disabilities of those persons.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 26; P.L. 1940, ch. 938, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-16-13

.

34-16-14.
Proof of title — Judgment.

No decision, judgment, or decree, excepting decrees taking the matter as confessed, shall be entered by default, but proof satisfactory to the court shall be offered in support of plaintiff’s claim of title and of all claims known to be, or which may be, adverse thereto, and the court shall thereafter enter judgment in accordance with the law and the evidence. The judgment, when final, shall be conclusive against all persons served as herein required, both known and unknown, and whether under disability or not, and whether service was personal, by registered or certified mail, or by publication.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 26; P.L. 1940, ch. 938, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-16-14

.

34-16-15.
Remedy cumulative.

The remedy provided by this chapter shall be cumulative and shall not exclude or prevent the exercise of any other right or remedy now allowed by law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 26; P.L. 1940, ch. 938, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-16-15

.